Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2217
Registration certificate; term; filing; failure to file; effect; not transferable.

Each registration certificate issued to each applicant shall expire by its own terms one year from the date of issuance and may not be renewed. Each professional corporation must annually apply to its regulating board for a registration certificate in the manner provided in section 21-2216. A certificate from the regulating board as provided in section 21-2216 must annually be filed with the Secretary of State within thirty days of the expiration date of the last certificate on file in the office of the Secretary of State or such corporation shall be suspended. If the corporation is suspended, the biennial report and tax cannot be filed and paid in the office of the Secretary of State until the certificate from the regulating board is filed in the office of the Secretary of State. If the report is not filed, the tax paid, and the certificate filed by April 16 of the current year, when the report and tax become delinquent, the corporation shall be dissolved for nonpayment of taxes in compliance with section 21-323. Registration certificates shall not be transferable or assignable.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 17, p. 561;

Laws 1971, LB 489, § 2;

Laws 1973, LB 157, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 186, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 19.